Utah statutes.
11-42-104.   Waiver by property owners -- Requirements.

(1)  The owners of property to be assessed within an assessment area may waive:

(a)  the prepayment period under Subsection 11-42-411(6);

(b)  a procedure that a local entity is required to follow to:

(i)  designate an assessment area; or

(ii)  levy an assessment; or

(c)  a period to contest a local entity action.

(2)  Each waiver under this section shall:

(a)  be in writing;

(b)  be signed by all the owners of property to be assessed within the assessment area;

(c)  describe the prepayment period, procedure, or contest period being waived;

(d)  state that the owners waive the prepayment period, procedure, or contest period; and

(e)  state that the owners consent to the local entity taking the required action to waive the prepayment period, procedure, or contest period.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

